Florida, session 2026, SB1792.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 539.003, Florida Statutes, is amended to 14 read: 15 539.003âConfidentiality.â 16 (1)âAll records relating to pawnbroker transactions 17 delivered to appropriate law enforcement officials and the 18 Department of Law Enforcement pursuant to s. 539.001 are 19 confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and 20 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution and may be used only 21 for official law enforcement purposes. This section does not 22 prohibit the disclosure by the appropriate law enforcement 23 officials or the Department of Law Enforcement of the name and 24 address of the pawnbroker, the name and address of the conveying 25 customer, or a description of pawned property to the alleged 26 owner of pawned property. 27 (2)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 28 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 29 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 30 through reenactment by the Legislature. 31 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 32 necessity that the records relating to pawnbroker transactions 33 which are delivered to the Department of Law Enforcement be made 34 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and 35 s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. Such records 36 contain sensitive personal identifying information from pawn 37 transactions, such as the pledgorâs or sellerâs name, address, 38 telephone number, birth date, physical description, and right 39 thumbprint. Access to such sensitive information would expose 40 pledgors and sellers to increased risks of identity theft. The 41 Legislature finds that expanding the public records exemption to 42 include records of pawnbroker transactions delivered to the 43 Department of Law Enforcement helps ensure uniformity with the 44 current exemption when such records are delivered to other law 45 enforcement officials and protects the effective administration 46 of statewide data sharing of secondhand dealer transactions. The 47 Legislature further finds that the harm that may result from the 48 release of such personal identifying information outweighs any 49 public benefit that may be derived from the disclosure of the 50 information. 51 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 52 SB 1582 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 53 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 54 thereof and becomes a law